Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 38 Wrongful Death

Cross references. —

As to cause of action for wrongful death, see art. 9, § 4, Wyo. Const.

As to right of action when death caused by work-related injuries, see §§

27-14-104

and

27-14-105

.

As to claim for damages when death caused by violation of safety regulations for mines, see §

30-2-106

.

Editor's notes. —

Sections 2 through 8, ch. 54, Laws 1982, read:

Approved March 9, 1982.

Chapter is Wyoming's version of Lord Campbell's Act.

Bircher v. Foster, 378 P.2d 901,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1963), overruled in part, Johnson v. Johnson (In re Estate of Johnson), 2010 WY 63, 231 P.3d 873,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2010).

Purpose. —

The whole import of the Wrongful Death Act is to benefit those persons who have been injured because of the death of a relative. Ashley v. Read Constr. Co., 195 F. Supp. 727, 1961 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2825 (D. Wyo. 1961).

In this chapter, the legislature has expressed a social policy that favors compensation to ameliorate the certain damage to relational interests resulting from the death of a family member. Nulle v. Gillette-Campbell County Joint Powers Fire Bd., 797 P.2d 1171,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1990).

Distinctions between survival and wrongful death statutes.
—

The prime difference between survival and wrongful death statutes is that the survival statute merely continues a cause of action in existence and the injured party's claim after death is an asset of the estate, while the wrongful death statute creates a new cause of action for the benefit of designated persons who have suffered the loss of a loved one and provider. De Herrera v. Herrera, 565 P.2d 479,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 263

(Wyo. 1977).

The survival statute protects the creditors of the estate; the Wrongful Death Act does not. De Herrera v. Herrera, 565 P.2d 479,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 263

(Wyo. 1977).

A survival claim is based on the decedent's claim for damages sustained during his lifetime, while a wrongful death action creates a new claim or cause of action for the loss sustained by statutory beneficiaries of the decedent (directly from his death). Rosa v. Cantrell, 705 F.2d 1208, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 23413 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 821, 104 S. Ct. 85, 78 L. Ed. 2d 94, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 1117 (U.S. 1983).

Essentials of wrongful death complaint

are: (1) the plaintiff's capacity to sue as personal representative of the deceased; (2) that the plaintiffs are the persons entitled by statute to damages; (3) that the plaintiffs allege sufficient facts to show in what particular the defendant was negligent; (4) that the defendant's negligence was the proximate cause of death and (5) damages. Harris v. Grizzle, 599 P.2d 580,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 445

(Wyo. 1979).

Effect of Worker's Compensation Act. —

Wrongful death statute is valid and is not repealed by the Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Act, except where it conflicts with the provisions of that act. Druley v. Houdesheldt, 75 Wyo. 155, 294 P.2d 351,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1956), rehearing denied, 75 Wyo. 166, 296 P.2d 251 (1956). See §

27-14-104

.

State courts have jurisdiction of action for wrongful death on military reservation.

Danielson v. Donmopray, 57 F.2d 565, 1932 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1134 (D. Wyo. 1932).

Law reviews. —

For comment “Comparative Negligence in Wyoming,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 597 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

22A Am. Jur. 2d Death § 1 et seq.

Venue of wrongful death action, 36 ALR2d 1146.

Minority of surviving children as tolling limitation period in state wrongful death action, 85 ALR3d 162.

Tortious maintenance or removal of life supports, 58 ALR4th 222.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for noneconomic loss caused by personal injury or death of parent, 61 ALR4th 251.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for noneconomic loss caused by personal injury or death of spouse, 61 ALR4th 309.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by activities of hospital “rescue team”, 64 ALR4th 1200.

Recovery in death action for failure to diagnose incurable disease which caused death, 64 ALR4th 1232.

Tort liability for window washer's injury or death, 69 ALR4th 207.

Statute of limitations in wrongful death action based on medical malpractice, 70 ALR4th 535.

When is death “instantaneous” for purposes of wrongful death or survival action, 75 ALR4th 151.

Recovery of damages for loss of consortium resulting from death of child—modern status, 77 ALR4th 411.

Admissibility of evidence, in action for personal injury or death, of injured party's use of intoxicants or illegal drugs on issue of life expectancy, 86 ALR4th 1135.

Wrongful death damages for loss of expectancy of inheritance from decedent, 42 ALR5th 465.

Admiralty jurisdiction: maritime nature of tort — modern cases, 80 ALR Fed 105.

Excessiveness or adequacy of compensatory damages for personal
injury to or death of seaman in actions under Jones Act (46 USC Appx § 688) or doctrine of unseaworthiness—modern cases,
96 ALR Fed 541.

Excessiveness or adequacy of award of damages for personal injury
or death in actions under Federal Employers' Liability Act (45 USC § 51 et seq.)—modern cases,
97 ALR Fed 189.

25A C.J.S. Death § 1 et seq.

§ 1-38-101.
Actions for wrongful death which survive; proceedings against executor
or administrator of person liable.

Whenever the death of
a person is caused by wrongful act, neglect or default such as would
have entitled the party injured to maintain an action to recover damages
if death had not ensued, the person who would have been liable if
death had not ensued is liable in an action for damages, even though
the death was caused under circumstances as amount in law to murder
in the first or second degree or manslaughter. If the person liable
dies, the action may be brought against the executor or administrator
of his estate. If he left no estate within the state of Wyoming, the
court may appoint an administrator upon application.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 39, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 2364a; R.S. 1899, § 3448; C.S. 1910, § 4291; C.S. 1920, § 5560; R.S. 1931, § 89-403; C.S. 1945, § 3-403; Laws 1947, ch. 95, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-1065; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

1-39-101

,

2-14-201

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1982, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to abatement and survival of actions generally, see §§

1-4-101

and

1-4-102

.

As to homicide generally, see §§

6-2-101

through

6-2-108

.

Section not repealed by constitution. —

The provisions of this section were not repealed by the adoption of the constitution. Mestas v. Diamond Coal & Coke Co., 12 Wyo. 414, 76 P. 567,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1904).

Section applies to citizens of other states. —

This section was intended to provide a remedy not only for the citizens of this state but for the citizens of other states, while passing through or residing within the state. Ashley v. Read Constr. Co., 195 F. Supp. 727, 1961 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2825 (D. Wyo. 1961).

Compared to survival of personal injury action. —

Where a person is injured by another, if he dies from other causes, an action for personal injury survives; however, if death results from the same injuries, the action may not be maintained by the personal representative for the estate, but may be brought under the wrongful death act for the next of kin. Robinson v. Pacificorp, 10 P.3d 1133,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 2000).

Loss of chance doctrine applicable. —

Recognition of a patient's loss of a chance “to live” as being actionable within the context of this section does not strain the bounds of reason, logic, or the law. A party is not required to establish the lost chance of recovery or survival in an exact percentage for the matter to be submitted to a jury. The jury is to consider evidence of percentages of the lost chance in the assessment and apportionment of damages, and the damages recoverable equals the total sum of the damages for the underlying injury or death multiplied by the percentage of the lost chance. McMackin v. Johnson County Healthcare Ctr., 2004 WY 44, 88 P.3d 491,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2004).

Derivative of underlying action. —

A wrongful death action brought pursuant to this section is derivative of the underlying cause of action which could have been brought by the deceased during his lifetime. Edwards v. Fogarty, 962 P.2d 879,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. Aug. 26, 1998).

Concerted action theory. —

Wrongful death action pursuant to this section was properly dismissed on summary judgment, because a reasonable jury could not have found that a minor boy whose snowboarding friend collided with wife of plaintiff widower to cause her death had encouraged his friend to ski in a tortious manner or knew that he was going to do so; thus, widower's “concerted action” claim was without merit.
Keith v. J.A., 295 Fed. Appx. 309, 2008 U.S. App. LEXIS 21366 (10th Cir. 2008).

Recovery allowed where death instantaneous. —

This section not being a survival statute, recovery may be had thereunder even though the deceased died instantaneously. Coliseum Motor Co. v. Hester, 43 Wyo. 298, 3 P.2d 105,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1931).

And where decedent's death is due to wrongful injuries.

Parsons v. Roussalis, 488 P.2d 1050,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1971).

When separate actions against successive joint tort-feasors
permitted. —

In a wrongful death suit, successive joint tort-feasors may be sued in separate actions where the facts of the claim in the first case are clearly different from those of the second case, the cause or causes of death have never been judicially determined and total actual damages expressed in a money amount have not been fixed. Harris v. Grizzle, 599 P.2d 580,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 445

(Wyo. 1979).

Construction with malpractice limitation statute. —

This section and §

1-3-107

, establishing a two-year time limitation for bringing a malpractice action, must be construed together; thus, where a decedent had failed to bring his claim against a physician and hospital within two-years, he had no viable action at the time of his death and a wrongful death action on behalf of his survivors was barred. Edwards v. Fogarty, 962 P.2d 879,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. Aug. 26, 1998).

When malpractice action not precluded by release of original
tort-feasor. —

If the release of the original tort-feasor is not actually intended to release doctors and hospitals who have treated or may in the future treat the tort victim, and if the amount paid to the tort victim does not constitute full compensation for claims against the original tort-feasor and the doctor and the hospital as well, and was not accepted as such, the tort victim can fairly and equitably seek further recovery from the doctor and the hospital for malpractice. Harris v. Grizzle, 599 P.2d 580,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 445

(Wyo. 1979).

Presumed that decedent exercised due care. —

In the absence of eye witnesses to an accident or other evidence sufficient to dispel or rebut the presumption, it is presumed that the decedent, acting on the instinct of self-preservation, was exercising ordinary care. However, the presumption becomes important only when negligence is found on the part of the defendant. Absent such a finding, the question of the decedent's due care does not arise. De Julio v. Foster, 715 P.2d 182,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 494

(Wyo. 1986).

Instruction adequately informed jury that anyone using public highway must keep proper lookout,

an entirely adequate statement of applicable Wyoming law. The instruction then defined “proper lookout” as that lookout which would be maintained by an ordinarily reasonable and prudent person in light of all present conditions and those reasonably to be anticipated. That instruction could not be said to have misled or confused the jury. De Julio v. Foster, 715 P.2d 182,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 494

(Wyo. 1986).

Personal Representative. —

Even though it is not controlling, one of the factors the district court should consider in appointing a personal representative in a wrongful death suit, particularly if the proposed appointment is contested, is the priority list contained in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 2-4-201(a); that statutory list reflects legislative policy as to the order of significant human relationships, and as such, it is a useful tool in considering suitability to act as personal representative. Because the filing of a wrongful death action presupposes that the personal representative intends to pursue a civil action against the alleged wrongdoer, the district court should also consider the petitioner's financial and physical ability to do so, his or her geographic location, his or her intentions in regard to legal representation, and his or her stake in the outcome; given the potential in a wrongful death action that a multitude of claimants may be coupled with a limited damages recovery, the issue of family harmony or disharmony may likewise be important in the selection of a personal representative.
Johnson v. Johnson (In re Estate of Johnson), 2010 WY 63, 231 P.3d 873,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2010).

Probate court erred in appointing a decedent's father as his personal representative for the purpose of filing a wrongful death suit because the appointment of a personal representative to pursue a wrongful death claim under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-38-101

and 102 was to be made by the district court within that wrongful death action.
Johnson v. Johnson (In re Estate of Johnson), 2010 WY 63, 231 P.3d 873,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2010).

Appointment of a personal representative for probate proceedings was separate and distinct from the appointment of a personal representative for purposes of pursuing a wrongful death action. While it was proper for the probate court to appoint a personal representative for handling matters associated with the decedent's estate, the appointment of a personal representative to pursue a wrongful death claim was to be made by the district court within that wrongful death action.
Johnson v. Johnson (In re Estate of Johnson), 2010 WY 63, 231 P.3d 873,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2010).

Applied

in

Merrill v. United Air Lines, 288 F.2d 218,

1961 U.S. App. LEXIS 4969

(2d Cir. 1961); Gillaspie v. Duncan, 410 P.2d 577,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1966); State ex rel. Sheehan v. District Court, 426 P.2d 431,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1967); Middaugh v. United States, 293 F. Supp. 977, 1968 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11870 (D. Wyo. 1968); Lopez v. Arroyo, 489 P.2d 626,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 256

(Wyo. 1971); Rosa v. Cantrell, 705 F.2d 1208,

1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 23413

(10th Cir. 1982); Wetering v. Eisele, 682 P.2d 1055,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1984).

Quoted

in

Corkill v. Knowles, 955 P.2d 438,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1998); Rodriguez v. Casey, 2002 WY 111, 50 P.3d 323,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Horvath v. Sheridan-Wyoming Coal Co., 58 Wyo. 211, 131 P.2d 315,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1942); Muir v. Haggerty, 77 Wyo. 280, 314 P.2d 948,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(1957); Druley v. Houdesheldt, 75 Wyo. 166, 296 P.2d 251 (1956); Grabowski v. United States, 294 F. Supp. 421, 1968 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 8001 (D. Wyo. 1968); Newcom v. Keever, 513 P.2d 1021,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 1973); Rutledge v. Vonfeldt, 564 P.2d 350,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 256

(Wyo. 1977); Mountain W. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. Hunt, 2000 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1338, 82 F. Supp. 2d 1261 (D. Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For note on wrongful death in Wyoming as to causes of action, see 16 Wyo. L.J. 171.

For article, “Wrongful Death and Rightful Damages,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 405 (1967).

For case note, “Wrongful Death — Siblings as Beneficiaries Under Wyoming's Wrongful Death Statutes, Wetering v. Eisele, 682 P.2d 1055,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1984),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 299 (1985).

For comment, “Wyoming Fetal Rights—Why the Abortion ‘Albatross’ Is a Bird of a Different Color: The Case for Fetal-Federalism,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 627 (1993).

For article, “Wyoming's New Comparative Fault Statute,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1996)

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Fact that tort-feasor is member of class of beneficiaries as affecting right to maintain action for wrongful death, 95 ALR2d 585.

Hospital's liability for personal injury or death of doctor, nurse, or attendant, 1 ALR3d 1036.

Official death certificate as evidence of cause of death in civil or criminal action, 21 ALR3d 418.

Owner's or keeper's liability for death inflicted by wild animal, 21 ALR3d 603.

Right to maintain direct action against fellow employee for death covered by workmen's compensation, 21 ALR3d 845.

Right of action for death of woman who consented to illegal abortion, 36 ALR3d 630.

Right to maintain action or to recover damages for death of unborn child, 84 ALR3d 411.

Action against parent by or on behalf of unemancipated minor child for wrongful death of other parent, 87 ALR3d 849.

Automobile occupant's failure to use seat belts as contributory negligence, 92 ALR3d 9.

Modern status of interspousal tort immunity in personal injury and wrongful death actions, 92 ALR3d 901.

Validity of release of prospective right to wrongful death action, 92 ALR3d 1232.

Judgment in death action as precluding subsequent personal injury action by potential beneficiary of death action, or vice versa, 94 ALR3d 676.

Drug manufacturer's promotion of product as affecting its liability for product-caused injury, 94 ALR3d 1080.

Liability for injury or death of participant in automobile or horse race at public track, 13 ALR4th 623.

Effect of death of beneficiary upon right of action under death statute, 13 ALR4th 1060.

Judgment in favor of, or adverse to, person injured as barring action for his death, 26 ALR4th 1264.

Liability of attorney for suicide of client based on attorney's professional act or omission, 41 ALR4th 351.

Primary liability of private chain franchisor for injury or death caused by franchise premises or equipment, 59 ALR4th 1142.

State and local government liability for injury or death of bicyclist due to defect or obstruction in public bicycle path, 68 ALR4th 204.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by spoilage, contamination, or other deleterious condition of food or food product, 2 ALR5th 1.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by food product containing object related to, but not intended to be present in, product, 2 ALR5th 189.

Liability of travel publication, travel agent, or similar party for personal injury or death of traveler, 2 ALR5th 396.

Right of workers' compensation insurer or employer paying to a workers' compensation fund, on the compensable death of an employee with no dependants, to indemnity or subrogation from proceeds of wrongful death action brought against third-party tortfeasor, 7 ALR5th 969.

Excessiveness or inadequacy of punitive damages awarded in personal injury or death cases, 12 ALR5th 195.

Venue of wrongful death action, 58 ALR5th 535.

Liability of landlord for injury or death occasioned by swimming pool maintained for tenants, 62 ALR5th 475.

Liability of owner of private residential swimming pool for injury or death occasioned thereby, 64 ALR5th 1.

§ 1-38-102.
Action to be brought by wrongful death representative; recovery exempt from debts; measure and element of damages; limitation of action.

Every wrongful death action under W.S.

1-38-101

shall be brought by and in the name of the decedent’s wrongful death representative for the exclusive benefit of beneficiaries who have sustained damage.

If the decedent left a husband, wife, child, father or mother, no debt of the decedent may be satisfied out of the proceeds of any judgment obtained in any action for wrongful death or out of the proceeds of any settlement of a wrongful death claim.

The court or jury, as the case may be, may award such damages, pecuniary and exemplary, as shall be deemed fair and just. Every person for whose benefit an action for wrongful death is brought may prove his respective damages, and the court or jury may award such person that amount of damages to which it considers such person entitled, including damages for loss of probable future companionship, society and comfort.

An action for wrongful death shall be commenced within two (2) years after the death of the decedent.

The court appointing the wrongful death representative may approve a settlement of a wrongful death action or a wrongful death claim and resolve disputes relating to the allocation of settlement proceeds.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 39, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 2364; R.S. 1899, § 3449; Laws 1909, ch. 3, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 4292; C.S. 1920, § 5561; R.S. 1931, § 89-404; Laws 1939, ch. 104, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 3-404; Laws 1947, ch. 132, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-1066; Laws 1973, ch. 139, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

1-39-102

, 2-14-202; Laws 1979, ch. 142, §§ 1, 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1982, ch. 54, § 1; 2012, ch. 5, § 2; 2021 ch. 99, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a), substituted “wrongful death” for “such,” inserted “under W.S.

1-38-101

,” and substituted “decedent's wrongful death” for “personal” and “for the exclusive benefit of beneficiaries who have sustained damage” for “of the deceased person”; in (b), substituted “decedent” for “deceased” twice, and “for wrongful death or out of the proceeds of any settlement of a wrongful death claim” for “brought under the provisions of this section”; in (c), deleted “in every such action” after “case may be,” and substituted “an action for wrongful death” for “such action”; in (d), substituted “An action for wrongful death” for “Every such action” and “decedent” for “deceased person,” and added the second sentence; and added (e).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2022, deleted the second sentence in (d), which read, "If the decedent's death involved medical malpractice this limitation period shall be tolled as provided in W.S.

9-2-1518

upon receipt by the director of the medical review panel of a malpractice claim."

I. General Consideration.

II. Personal Representative.

III. No Liability for Decedent's Debts.

IV. Beneficiaries of Action.

V. Damages.

VI. Limitation Of Actions.

§ 1-38-103.
Appointment of wrongful death representative.

The wrongful death representative may be appointed by the district court in the county in which:

The decedent resided;

The decedent died;

The claim for relief or some part of the claim for relief arose; or

A defendant resides or may be summoned.

The district court may appoint the wrongful death representative at any time after the decedent’s death. The appointment shall be made in a separate action brought solely for appointing the wrongful death representative. In any action in which appointment of the wrongful death representative is sought, any person claiming to qualify under W.S. 1-38-104(a) may intervene as a matter of right. After an action to appoint the wrongful death representative is filed:

No subsequent action for appointment may be maintained; and

If an action to appoint the wrongful death representative is properly filed, the limitation period under W.S. 1-38-102(d) and any other applicable limitation periods shall be tolled from the time the action is filed until thirty (30) days after an order appointing the wrongful death representative is entered.

The appointment of the wrongful death representative is a procedural device intended to provide a representative to investigate and bring an action under W.S.

1-38-101

. Irregularities in the manner or method of appointment are not jurisdictional.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 5, § 1; 2013 ch. 177, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

in (b)(ii) inserted “and any other applicable limitation periods” preceding “shall be tolled.”

Laws 2013, ch. 177, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2013.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 5, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2012.

Jurisdiction.—

The vacating of a district court’s order finding a nursing and long-term care facility in contempt after the facility failed to comply with an order compelling it to respond to a pre-suit subpoena served in an action for appointment of a wrongful death representative was appropriate because the court lacked jurisdiction to compel discovery in the appointment proceeding. Life Care Ctr. of Casper v. Barrett, 2020 WY 57, 462 P.3d 894,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2020).

§ 1-38-104.
Factors
for determining wrongful death representative.

In appointing the wrongful death representative, the court shall determine the person who will best represent the interests of the potential beneficiaries of the action as a whole.

In determining whether the best interests of potential beneficiaries as a whole will be served by appointment of the wrongful death representative, the court shall consider:

The familial or other relationship of the person making application to the decedent;

The interests of the person making application in relation to the interests of other potential beneficiaries as a whole;

Actions taken to secure appointment as the wrongful death representative and to protect the interests of all potential beneficiaries;

Such other factors as the court deems relevant.

No appeal shall be allowed from an order appointing the wrongful death representative. The court, however, may entertain a motion to reconsider an appointment of the wrongful death representative.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 5, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 5, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2012.

§ 1-38-105.
Notice.

Within thirty (30) days of the filing of an action to appoint the wrongful death representative, the plaintiff shall cause to be published once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a daily or weekly newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the decedent resided at the time of death, a notice that an action to appoint the wrongful death representative has been instituted and that any person claiming to qualify under W.S. 1-38-104(a) may intervene as a matter of right.

Within sixty (60) days after appointment, the wrongful death representative shall file with the court a report listing all reasonably ascertainable beneficiaries. The report shall set forth all reasonable efforts made by the wrongful death representative to notify such beneficiaries of the wrongful death representative’s appointment.

Irregularities in the manner or method of giving notice under this section are not jurisdictional.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 5, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 5, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2012.